Hawaii, session 2025, SB173.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  (a)  There is established within the judiciary a three-year pilot program to provide free child care services to minor children of parties and witnesses who are attending court hearings in the first circuit; provided that the free child care services shall only be offered in an area designated by the judiciary. (b) The judiciary shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations regarding the pilot program, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than forty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2026, 2027, and 2028. SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $400,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the judiciary to establish a pilot program to provide free child care services to minor children of parties and witnesses who are attending court hearings in the first circuit. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the judiciary for the purposes of this Act; provided that this appropriation shall not lapse at the end of fiscal year 2026-2027; provided further that all moneys that are unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________